apertium-tur.tur.lexc
LEXICON V-PAST

%<past%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-INFL-PRE-COP ;

LEXICON V-POT

%<pot%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} V-INFL-PRE-COP ;



LEXICON V-IMP

%<imp%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}y%{I%}m V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ; ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}y%{I%}m V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;            ! sen (p2.sg)
%<imp%>%<emph%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%} V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ; !
%<imp%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<imp%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}l%{I%}m V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}n V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ; ! siz (p2.sg.frm, p2.pl.*)
!%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}n%{I%}z V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ; ! super polite
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}n%{I%}z V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ; ! super polite
%<imp%>%<emph%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ; ! mostly plural non-polite
%<imp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;

LEXICON V-IFI-COND-COMMON

V-IFI-COND-PERS ;
!COPULA-IFI-MI ;

LEXICON V-IFI

%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-IFI-COND-COMMON ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-IFI-COP ;


!→!LEXICON V-COND-COMMON
!→!
!→!V-IFI-COND-PERS ;
!→!COPULA-IFI ;

LEXICON V-COND

%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-COND-COP ;
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-IFI-COND-COMMON ;
%<gna_cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-IFI-COND-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-COND-COP
%+i%<cop%>:%>%{y%} V-COND-COP-IFI ;

LEXICON V-COND-COP-IFI
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-IFI-COND-COMMON ;

!LEXICON V-IFI-COND-PERS
!
!V-IFI-COND-PERS ;
!COPULA-COND ;

LEXICON V-COP-PERS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;

LEXICON V-COP-IFI-PERS 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
!%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;


LEXICON V-IFI-COND-PERS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST ;

LEXICON V-IFI-COND-PERS-QST
%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} # ;
# ;

!!!!!!!COPULA SUFFIXES!!!!!!


!LEXICON COPULA-TNS-COMMON
!V-PAST ;

LEXICON V-INFL-PRE-COP
# ;
V-DUB ;
V-DUB-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-DUB
%<dub%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-DUB-COMMON ;
V-DUB-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-DUB-COMMON
V-IFI-COP ;
V-MI ;
V-MI-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IFI-COP
%+i%<cop%>:%>%{y%} V-IFI-COP-COND ;

LEXICON V-MI
%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} V-MI-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-MI-COMMON
V-COP ;

LEXICON V-COP
%+i%<cop%>:%>%{y%} V-COP-IFI ;
%+i%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-COP-PERS ;
%+i%<cop%>%<aor%>: COPULA-P3-PERS ;
%+i%<cop%>%<dub%>%<aor%>:i%>m%{I%}ş V-COP-PERS ; 
# ;

LEXICON V-COP-IFI
%<ifi%>:%{D%}%{I%} V-COP-IFI-PERS ;

LEXICON V-IFI-COP-COND
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-IFI-COND-COMMON ;

LEXICON COPULA-MIMIS-DUB
%<dub%>:%>m%{I%}ş COPULA-MIMIS-COMMON ;
COPULA-MIMIS-COMMON ;

LEXICON COPULA-MIMIS-COMMON
COPULA-IFI-KEN ;
COPULA-COND ;

LEXICON COPULA-MIMIS-COP
%+i%<cop%>:%>%{y%} COPULA-MIMIS-DUB ;
%+i%<cop%>: COPULA-AOR ;
%+i%<cop%>%<dub%>:%>%{y%}m%{I%}ş COPULA-AOR ;
!%+i%<cop%>%<aor%>: COPULA-P3-PERS ;
!%+i%<cop%>%<aor%>: COPULA-PERS ;
!%+i%<cop%>: COPULA-PERS ; !commented out because it leads to <cop>-with-no-tense readings

LEXICON COPULA-P3-PERS

%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;


!LEXICON COPULA-PERS

!%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
! %<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r # ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;  ! FIXME!!!
!%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;  ! FIXME!!!

!LEXICON COPULA-NOMI
!%+i%<cop%>:%>%{y%} COPULA-TNS ;
!COPULA-MIMIS-DUB ;

LEXICON COPULA-MIMIS-MI
%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} COPULA-MIMIS-COP ;
COPULA-MIMIS-COP ;

!LEXICON COPULA-TNS-MI
!
!COPULA-IFI-COND-MI ;
!COPULA-AOR ;

!LEXICON COPULA-TNS
!
!COPULA-IFI-COND ;
!COPULA-AOR ;

LEXICON COPULA-MIMIS

COPULA-MIMIS-MI ;
!V-INFL-PRE-COP ;
!COPULA-MIMIS-COP ;

!!! WE PROBABLY WANT THIS
!→!
!→!LEXICON COPULA-MISMI-COMMON
!→!
!→!COPULA-IFI-AOR ;
!→!COPULA-COND ;
!→!
!→!LEXICON COPULA-MISMI-COP
!→!
!→!%+i%<cop%>:%>%{y%} COPULA-MISMI-COMMON ;
!→!
!→!LEXICON COPULA-MISMI-MI
!→!
!→!%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} COPULA-MISMI-COP ;
!→!COPULA-MISMI-COP ;
!→!
!→!LEXICON COPULA-MISMI-DUB
!→!
!→!%<dub%>:%>m%{I%}ş COPULA-MISMI-MI ;
!→!COPULA-MISMI-MI ;
!→!
!→!LEXICON COPULA-MISMI
!→!
!→!COPULA-MISMI-DUB ;
!→!
!!! TO HERE

LEXICON COPULA-IFI-KEN

COPULA-IFI ;
COPULA-KEN ;

LEXICON COPULA-KEN !!! ADVERBIAL FORM 

%<gna_ken%>:%>%{y%}ken # ;

LEXICON COPULA-AOR

%<aor%>: PERS-COP-PRES ;

!!!!%<aor%>:% m%{I%} PERS-COP-PRES-MI ;
!
!LEXICON PERS-COP-PRES-MI
!
!%<p1%>%<sg%>%+%mı%<qst%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>%+%mı%<qst%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>%+%mı%<qst%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
!%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%+%mı%<qst%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>%+%mı%<qst%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>%+%mı%<qst%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>%+%mı%<qst%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;

LEXICON PERS-COP-PRES

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gm%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gm%>:%>s%{I%}n%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;  ! FIXME!!!
%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gm%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r # ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gm%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gm%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;  ! FIXME!!!
%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gm%>:%>l%{A%}r%{D%}%{I%}r # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gm%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}rl%{A%}r # ; 



LEXICON COPULA-IFI-PRS
!!! +mı<qst> YOK!

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON COPULA-IFI
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} COPULA-IFI-PRS ;

!LEXICON COPULA-IFI-MI
!%+i%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>%{y%}%>%{D%}%{I%} V-IFI-COND-PERS ;

LEXICON COPULA-COND

%<cond%>:s%{A%} V-IFI-COND-PERS ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Clitics 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLIT


! %+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} V-COP-IFI-PERS ; 
%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} # ;               ! generic Q marker, no copula
# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.
! COPULA-MIMIS ;

LEXICON CLIT-NOPERS

%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} # ; 
# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.

!→!LEXICON CLIT-W-COPULA
!→!
!→!%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} PERS-COP-PRES ; 
!→!# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.

!→!LEXICON V-PERS-COP
!→!
!→!%+i%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ;
!→!%+i%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>%{y%}%{D%}%{I%} V-COP-IFI-PERS ;

LEXICON V-NOPERS-COP

%+i%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ;
%+i%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-COP-IFI-PERS ;

LEXICON CLIT-GENERAL    ! Includes personal copula suffixes, therefore appears only
                        ! after nominal parts of speech (and only after some cases).
                        ! FIXME: to be checked whether leads to any overgeneration
CLIT ;
COPULA-MIMIS ;

! FIXME: deduplicated 2015-01-01: CHECK whether this is the right one!
!LEXICON CLIT-NOPERS
!
!!!! CLIT-NOPERS ;  ! FIXME:Cyclic
!V-NOPERS-COP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Personal suffixes
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!! FIXME: Move from VERBS here.


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ATTR ! Adjective inflection

CLIT ;
# ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     NOMINAL INFLECTION (N-INFL-COMMON)!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRON-PERS
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ben V-COP ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:benim V-COP ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:bana CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:beni CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:bende CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:benden CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:bendeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:bence CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sen V-COP ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:senin V-COP ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:sana CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:seni CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sende CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:senden CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sendeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:sence CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:o V-COP ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:onun V-COP ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ona CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:onu CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:onda CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ondan CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ondeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:once CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:biz V-COP ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:bizim V-COP ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:bize CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:bizi CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizde CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:bizden CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:bizce CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:siz V-COP ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:sizin V-COP ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:size CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sizi CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizde CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:sizden CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:sizce CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:siz V-COP ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:sizin V-COP ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:size CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:sizi CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sizde CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:sizden CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sizdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:sizce CLIT ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:bizler V-COP ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:bizlerin V-COP ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:bizlere CLIT ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:bizleri CLIT ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizlerde CLIT ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:bizlerden CLIT ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizlerdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
bizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:bizlerce CLIT ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:sizler V-COP ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:sizlerin V-COP ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:sizlere CLIT ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sizleri CLIT ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizlerde CLIT ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:sizlerden CLIT ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizlerdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:sizlerce CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:onlar V-COP ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:onların V-COP ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:onlara CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:onları CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:onlarda CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:onlardan CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:onlardeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:onlarca CLIT ; 
